Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 2. Local Sales Tax
§ 39-15-204.
Taxation rate.

In addition to the state tax imposed under W.S.

39-15-101

through

39-15-111

any county of the state may impose the following excise taxes and any city or town may impose the taxes authorized by paragraphs (ii) and (vii) of this subsection and any resort district may impose the tax authorized by paragraph (v) of this subsection:

An excise tax at a rate in increments of one-half of one percent (.5%) not to exceed a rate of two percent (2%) upon retail sales of tangible personal property, admissions and services made within the county, the purpose of which is for general revenue;

An excise tax at a rate in increments of one percent (1%) not to exceed a rate of two percent (2%) upon the sales price paid for lodging services as defined under W.S.

39-15-101

(a)(i), the primary purpose of which is for local travel and tourism promotion;

An excise tax not to exceed two percent (2%) upon retail sales of tangible personal property, admissions and services made within the county. The total excise tax imposed within any county under this paragraph shall not exceed two percent (2%). The revenue from the tax shall be used in a specified amount for specific purposes authorized by the qualified electors and as provided in W.S. 39-15-211(b)(iv). Specific purposes shall not include ordinary operations of local government except those operations related to a specific project or as authorized by W.S. 39-15-203(a)(iii)(H);

In no event shall the total excise tax imposed within any county under the provisions of paragraphs (i), (iii) and (vi) of this subsection exceed three percent (3%);

An excise tax at a rate in increments of one-half of one percent (.5%) not to exceed a rate of three percent (3%) upon retail sales of tangible personal property, admissions and services made within the district by vendors physically situated within the district, the purpose of which is for general revenue for the resort district;

An excise tax at a rate in increments of one-quarter of one percent (.25%) not to exceed a rate of one percent (1%) upon retail sales of tangible personal property, admissions and services made within the county, the purpose of which is for economic development;

An excise tax at a rate in increments of one-quarter of one percent (.25%) not to exceed a rate of one percent (1%) upon retail sales of tangible personal property, admissions and services made within the city or town, the purpose of which is for general revenue or for a specific purpose and in a specified amount as provided in the proposition to impose the tax.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2003, ch. 23, § 1; ch. 72, § 2; 2005, ch. 239, § 1; 2007, ch. 74, § 1; ch. 133, § 1; 2019 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 14, § 1, effective January 1, 2021; 2020 ch. 88, § 1, effective March 13, 2020; 2020 ch. 110, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (a)(vi), and updated an internal reference accordingly in (a)(iv).

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment by ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “three percent (3%)” for “one percent (1%)” in (a)(v).

The second 2007 amendment by ch. 133, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “two percent (2%)” for “one percent (1%) in (i); and substituted “three percent (3%)” for “two percent (2%)” in (iv).

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(iii), added "and as provided in W.S. 39-15-211(b)(iv)" following "qualified electors" in the third sentence.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 14, § 1, effective January 1, 2021, in (a)(ii), substituted “two percent (2%)” for “four percent (4%)” at the end.

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 88, § 1, in (a)(iii) added “or as authorized by W.S. 39-15-203(a)(iii)(H)” at the end.

Laws 2020, ch. 88, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

The third 2020 amendment, by ch. 110, § 1, effective January 1, 2021, in the introductory language of (a) substituted “taxes authorized by paragraphs (ii) and (vii)” for “tax authorized by paragraph (ii)”; and added (a)(vii).

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2007, Ch. 133, § 2 states as follows: “Nothing in this act shall affect any tax previously imposed under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i) or 39-16-204(a)(i) and in effect prior to the effective date of this act.”

Applied

in

Gronberg v. Teton County Hous. Auth. & Erving W. Mantey & Caryl S. Mantey, 2011 WY 13, 247 P.3d 35,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Feb. 1, 2011).

§ 39-15-205.
Exemptions.

There are no specific applicable provisions for exemptions for this article. The provisions of W.S.

39-15-105

shall apply to the taxes imposed by this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-15-206.
Licenses; permits.

An additional license to engage in business shall not be required if the vendor has been issued a state license pursuant to law.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-15-207.
Compliance; collection procedures.

Returns, reports and preservation of records. There are no specific applicable provisions for returns, reports and preservation of records for this article.

Payment. There are no specific applicable provisions for payment for this article.

Timelines. Local tax rates and boundary changes for purposes of this article shall be effective on the first day of a calendar quarter after sixty (60) days notice has been given to a vendor. In the case of a vendor selling from a printed catalog, the new tax rate shall take effect on the first day of the calendar quarter following one hundred twenty (120) days notice provided to the vendor.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2001, ch. 147, § 2.

§ 39-15-208.
Enforcement.

There are no specific applicable provisions for enforcement for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-15-209.
Taxpayer remedies.

There are no specific applicable provisions for taxpayer remedies for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-15-210.
Statute of limitations.

No person shall be liable for payment of the tax imposed under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(ii) for any sale of lodging services made more than one (1) year prior to the date he is notified by the department of revenue of his liability for the tax.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-15-211.
Distribution.

For all revenue collected by the department from the taxes imposed under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i), (ii), (v) and (vi) the department shall:

For revenues collected under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(i):

Deduct one percent (1%) to defray the costs of collecting the tax and administrative expenses incident thereto which shall be deposited into the general fund;

Deposit the remainder into an account for monthly distribution to counties imposing the tax and its cities and towns. The distribution to the county and its cities and towns shall be equal to the amount collected in each county less the costs of collection as provided by subparagraph (a)(i)(A) of this section. The distribution shall be as follows:

To the county for deposit into its general fund in the proportion the population of the county situated outside the corporate limits of its cities and towns bears to the total population of the county;

To the incorporated cities and towns within the county for deposit into their treasuries in the proportion the population of each city or town bears to the total population of the county.

Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, a county and its cities and towns receiving distributions under this paragraph may expend not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount received under subparagraph (B) of this paragraph for the purposes of economic development provided:

The intent to use a portion of the amount distributed for economic development was indicated by specific language on the ballot as provided by W.S. 39-15-203(a)(i)(C) or the enactment of a resolution or ordinance stating that a portion of the proceeds would be used for “economic development”;

The county has not imposed a tax under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(vi).

For revenues collected under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(ii):

During the first year the tax is imposed in a county, city or town, two percent (2%) shall be deducted for the costs to the state of initial implementation of collection and administration of the tax, and one percent (1%) each year thereafter for state administrative costs with the proceeds to be deposited in the state general fund;

Except as provided in subparagraph (a)(ii)(C) of this section, distribute the balance on a monthly basis to the treasurer of each county, city or town imposing the tax in an amount equal to the amount collected in each entity less the costs of collection as provided by subparagraph (a)(ii)(A) of this section. Amounts distributed under this subparagraph shall be used for the following purposes:

Except as provided by subdivision (III) of this subparagraph, at least ninety percent (90%) of the amount distributed shall be used to promote travel and tourism within the county, city or town imposing the tax. Expenditures for travel and tourism promotion shall be limited to promotional materials, television and radio advertising, printed advertising, digital content, social media, promotion of tours, staging of events, educational materials, and other specific tourism related objectives, provided that none of these funds shall be spent for capital construction or improvements. If the amount is collected under a tax imposed countywide, expenditures of this amount shall be made in accordance with the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act by a joint powers board established pursuant to law by the county and a majority of incorporated municipalities within the county. Membership of the board shall include at least one (1) representative appointed by each governmental entity made a party to the agreement and the majority of the board membership shall be comprised of representatives of the travel and tourism industry;

Except as provided by subdivision (III) of this subparagraph, the amount remaining not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the total amount distributed shall be used for general revenue within the governmental entity imposing the tax. If the amount is collected under a tax imposed countywide, the joint powers board established under subdivision (a)(ii)(B)(I) of this section shall distribute the amount remaining to the county for deposit in its general fund in the proportion that the amount collected outside the corporate limits of its cities and towns bears to the total amount collected within the county, and to incorporated cities and towns within the county for deposit into their treasuries in the proportion that the amount collected within the corporate limits of each city and town bears to the total amount collected within the county;

If any of the conditions specified in subparagraph (H) of this paragraph are met, the amount collected less the cost of collection as provided by subparagraph (a)(ii)(A) of this section shall be distributed as follows:

Sixty percent (60%) shall be used to promote travel and tourism within the county, city or town imposing the tax in accordance with subdivision (I) of this subparagraph;

Ten percent (10%) shall be deposited in the general fund of the county. If the amount is collected under a tax imposed countywide, the joint powers board established under subdivision (a)(ii)(B)(I) of this section shall distribute the amount to the county for deposit in its general fund in the proportion that the amount collected outside the corporate limits of its cities and towns bears to the total amount collected within the county, and to incorporated cities and towns within the county for deposit into their treasuries in the proportion that the amount collected within the corporate limits of each city and town bears to the total amount collected within the county;

Thirty percent (30%) shall be used for the provision of visitor impact services within the governmental entity imposing the tax. If the amount is collected under a tax imposed countywide, the joint powers board shall distribute the amount to the county under the same terms and conditions as provided under subdivision (III)(2) of this subparagraph, but the funds shall only be used for the purposes specified in this subdivision. As used in this section, “visitor impact services” includes, but is not limited to, provision of vehicle parking, public transportation, public restrooms, pedestrian and bicycle pathways, museums and other displays.

If the proposition to continue the tax is defeated and a county, city or town does not reimpose the tax under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(ii), the department shall retain revenues collected during the last three (3) months the tax is in effect to provide for refund of any overpayment of tax. One (1) year after the tax expires, the department shall distribute the balance of the revenues retained under this subparagraph to the treasurer of that county, city or town;

through (G) Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 14, § 2.

(H)

The amount collected shall be distributed as provided in subdivision (B)(III) of this paragraph if the revenue collected by the county, city or town equals or exceeds the amounts as specified in subdivisions (I) through (III) of this subparagraph, adjusted annually for the percentage increase in the Wyoming cost-of-living index for the previous fiscal year as determined by the division of economic analysis of the department of administration and information:

If the county, city or town is not imposing a lodging tax under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(ii), the amount of assessment revenue received from the two percent (2%) assessment on lodging services imposed pursuant to W.S. 39-15-104(h)(ii) for each of the preceding three (3) years equals or exceeds one million eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,850,000.00) or it can reasonably be presumed, based on sales tax collection records, that the annual amount that will be received by the city, town or county will equal or exceed one million eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,850,000.00);

If the county, city or town has imposed a one percent (1%) lodging tax under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(ii), the amount of assessment revenue received from that tax plus the two percent (2%) assessment on lodging services imposed pursuant to W.S. 39-15-104(h)(ii) for each of the preceding three (3) years equals or exceeds two million seven hundred eighty thousand dollars ($2,780,000.00) or it can reasonably be presumed, based on sales tax collection records, that the annual amount that will be received by the city, town or county will equal or exceed two million seven hundred eighty thousand dollars ($2,780,000.00);

If the county, city or town has imposed a two percent (2%) lodging tax under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(ii), the amount of assessment revenue received from that tax plus the two percent (2%) assessment on lodging services imposed pursuant to W.S. 39-15-104(h)(ii) for each of the preceding three (3) years equals or exceeds three million seven hundred thousand dollars ($3,700,000.00) or it can reasonably be presumed, based on sales tax collection records, that the annual amount that will be received by the city, town or county will equal or exceed three million seven hundred thousand dollars ($3,700,000.00).

For revenues collected under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(v):

Deduct one percent (1%) to defray the costs of collecting the tax and administrative expenses incident thereto which shall be deposited into the general fund;

Deposit the remainder into an account for monthly distribution to resort districts imposing the tax.

For revenues collected under W.S. 39-15-204(a)(vi):

Deduct one percent (1%) to defray the costs of collecting the tax and administrative expenses incident thereto which shall be deposited into the general fund;

Deposit the remainder into an account for monthly distribution to counties imposing the tax and its cities and towns. The distribution to the county and its cities and towns shall be equal to the amount collected in each county less the costs of collection as provided by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. The distribution shall be as follows:

To the county for deposit into its general fund in the proportion the population of the county situated outside the corporate limits of its cities and towns bears to the total population of the county;

To the incorporated cities and towns within the county for deposit into their treasuries in the proportion the population of each city or town bears to the total population of the county.

For all revenue collected by the department from the taxes imposed by W.S. 39-15-204(a)(iii) the department shall:

Deduct one percent (1%) to defray the costs of collecting the tax and administrative expenses incident thereto which shall be deposited into the general fund;

Deposit the remainder into an account for monthly distribution to the county treasurer of the county in which the tax has been imposed to be distributed immediately by the treasurer to the sponsoring entity;

Any interest earned from investment of the revenues may only be used for costs related to the purposes approved on the ballot, including operation and maintenance costs, and shall be distributed to each sponsoring entity in the same proportion as its cost is to the total cost of all purposes identified on the ballot;

If taxes collected exceed the amount necessary for the approved purpose, the excess funds shall be retained by the county treasurer for one (1) year for refund of overpayments of the tax imposed pursuant to this act upon order of the department. After one (1) year any interest earned on the excess funds and the excess funds less any refunds ordered shall be deposited in the applicable reserve account authorized by W.S. 39-15-203(a)(iii)(H) or transferred to the county or municipality as specified in the resolution adopted pursuant to W.S. 39-15-203(a)(iii)(A). If the resolution fails to specify how excess funds will be expended and after all approved purposes have been completed, the county treasurer shall transfer the excess funds less any refunds ordered to each city and town within the county in the proportion the population of the city or town bears to the population of the county and to the county in the proportion that the population of the unincorporated areas of the county bears to the population of the county. After a public hearing, with notice of the public hearing published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least thirty (30) days before the public hearing, the governing body of the county and each municipality may appropriate its proportion of excess funds for other specific purposes authorized by a majority vote of the governing body, which shall not include the ordinary operations of local government. Excess funds collected on the propositions approved prior to January 1, 1989, and any interest earned shall be retained by the county treasurer for use in any purposes approved by the electors in accordance with procedures set forth in this section and for refunds of overpayment of taxes imposed pursuant to this act upon the order of the department, except that, with the approval of the governing bodies adopting the initial resolution, the excess funds and any interest earned may be used for the needs of the project for which the tax was approved.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 54, § 2.

For all revenue collected by the department from the taxes imposed by W.S. 39-15-204(a)(vii) the department shall:

Deduct one percent (1%) to defray the costs of collecting the tax and administrative expenses incident thereto which shall be deposited into the general fund;

Deposit the remainder into an account for monthly distribution to the city or town in which the tax has been imposed which shall only be used by the city or town for costs related to the purposes approved in the proposition to impose the tax.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 6, § 3; ch. 26, § 1; 1999, ch. 54, §§ 1, 2; ch. 183, § 1; 2003, ch. 72, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; ch. 239, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 14, §§ 1, 2, effective January 1, 2021; 2020 ch. 88, § 1, effective March 13, 2020; 2020 ch. 110, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “an account” for “the trust and agency fund” in (a)(i)(B), (a)(iii)(B), and (b)(ii).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 239, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added (a)(i)(C) and (a)(iv), and updated an internal reference in the introductory language in (a).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out as directed by the legislative service office. The bracketed text in subparagraph (a)(iv)(B) has been inserted as the repeal of the trust and agency fund is effective, and funds that would be deposited into the trust and agency fund are to be deposited into an account in accordance with Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b)(i), substituted “For all revenue” for “Revenue” and “the department shall” for “shall be transferred to the state treasurer who shall” in the introductory language of (a) and (b); and inserted “by the state treasurer”.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “an account” for “the trust and agency fund” in (a)(iv)(B).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(iv), added the third and fourth sentences.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 14, §§ 1, 2, effective January 1, 2021, in (a)(ii)(B)(I), added “digital content, social media,” preceding “promotion of tours,” added “staging of events, educational materials” following “promotion of tours,” deleted “and not more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000.00) of these funds shall be spent for purposes of matching state general funds under the matching funds program administered by the Wyoming business council” from the end of the second sentence; in (a)(ii)(B)(III), added “any of” following “If” and substituted “subparagraph (H)” for “subparagraphs (D) through (G)”; repealed (a)(ii)(D) through (a)(ii)(G); and added (a)(ii)(H).

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 88, § 1, in (b)(iv) substituted “shall be deposited in the applicable reserve account authorized by W.S. 39-15-203(a)(iii)(H) or transferred” for “shall be transferred” in the second sentence.

Laws 2020, ch. 88, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

The third 2020 amendment, by ch. 110, § 1, effective January 1, 2021, added (d).

While none of the amendments gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 3, and ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 1998, amended W.S. 39-6-412, which was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 4. The amendments to § 39-6-402 were subsequently incorporated into this section, as enacted by Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

How interest and penalty accrue. —

Interest and penalty for failure to pay sales and use taxes accrue, not by reason of assessment by board of equalization (now department), but by virtue of tax statutes, and taxpayers are not relieved from penalties and interest on amount actually due. Morrison-Knudson Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 58 Wyo. 500, 135 P.2d 927,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1943).

Provision for interest is separate from that for penalty

and only the latter is nonassessable unless nonpayment of tax is due to negligence or intentional disregard of rules. Morrison-Knudson Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 58 Wyo. 500, 135 P.2d 927,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1943).

Interest not chargeable where hearing wrongfully denied. —

Where court held use and sales taxpayers were wrongfully denied hearing on amount due, no interest could be charged on assessment from time hearing was refused to time it was finally had. Morrison-Knudson Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 58 Wyo. 500, 135 P.2d 927,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1943).

Elimination of penalty where good faith contest. —

Where taxpayer unsuccessfully but in good faith contended sales tax was not due on sales to nonresidents and reasonable question had existed whether rules were applicable, the penalty had to be eliminated from the assessment. Morrison-Knudson Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 58 Wyo. 500, 135 P.2d 927,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1943).

No credit against business's liability resulting from overpayment of taxes by customers. —

A business erroneously collected sales tax from its customers and remitted the same to the state, and was assessed sales and use tax on materials consumed by it as a contractor. When the state failed to provide a credit under this section for the sales tax collected, a declaratory judgment action was brought. Such an action was improper, however, as the case did not concern the constitutionality or interpretation of this section, which is not concerned with the granting of credit against a person's liability through the application of moneys resulting from overpayment by third parties. M & B Drilling & Constr. Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 706 P.2d 243,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 560

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

State Bd. of Equalization v. Jackson Hole Ski Corp., 737 P.2d 350,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Retailer's or buyer's defenses against exaction of penalties for failure to file, or deficiency in, state or local sales tax return, 20 ALR4th 952.